Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3702
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the College Pathway Program Act:

(1) Eligible provider means a provider who meets the requirements of section 79-3703;

(2) Low-income student means a student eligible for free or reduced-price lunches in high school or a student whose family's taxable income for the preceding year did not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level; and

(3) Underrepresented student means a student whose race is not proportionately represented at the institution at which the student is enrolled or applying for admission as the representation of such race in the population of Nebraska.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 9.